Washington statutes.
RCW 12.08.050

Denial of knowledge or information—Effect.

A statement in an answer or reply, that the party has not sufficient knowledge or information, in respect to a particular allegation in the previous pleadings of the adverse party to form a belief, shall be deemed equivalent to a denial.

[Code 1881 s 1760; 1873 p 345 s 59; 1854 p 231 s 47; RRS s 1782.]